apertium-oci.oci.metadix
        <pardef n="c/òder__vblex">        
      <e><p><l>oderíem</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>oderia</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>oderíetz</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>oderies</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>oderien</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>oderie</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>oderam</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>oderè</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>oderatz</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>oderàs</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>oderàn</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>oderà</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>odent</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>odent</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantant"/></e>        
      <e><p><l>odérem</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>odí</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>odéretz</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>odís</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>oderes</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>oderen</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>odec</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>odeguérem</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                
      <e r="LR"><p><l>odeguí</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>                
      <e r="LR"><p><l>odeguéretz</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                
      <e r="LR"><p><l>odeguís</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>odegueres</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>                
      <e r="LR"><p><l>odegueren</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                
      <e r="LR"><p><l>odeguec</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>odem</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>odem</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantem"/></e>                
      <e r="LR"><p><l>odam</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                
      <e r="LR"><p><l>odam</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantem"/></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>odegam</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>odegam</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantem"/></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>odésquem</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>odésquem</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantem"/></e>        
      <e><p><l>odetz</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>odetz</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantem"/></e>        
      <e><p><l>òtz</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>òtz</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__sigues"/></e>        
      <e><p><l>òden</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>òden</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantant"/></e>        
      <e><p><l>òde</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cante"/></e>        
      <e><p><l>òder</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>oder</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantar"/></e>        
    <e alt="oci@aran"><p><l>odé</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__ac"/></e>        
    <e alt="oci@gascon"><p><l>odé</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__ac"/></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>odé</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantar"/></e>        
      <e><p><l>odíem</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>odia</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>odíetz</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>odies</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>odien</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>odie</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>odévem</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>odeva</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>odévetz</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>odeves</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>odeven</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>odeve</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>odéssem</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>odessa</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>odéssetz</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>odesses</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>odessen</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>odesse</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>odeguéssem</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>odeguessa</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>odeguéssetz</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>odeguesses</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>odeguessen</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>odeguesse</l><r>òder<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        

    <e lm="còder"><i>c</i><par n="c/òder__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="escòder" r="LR"><i>esc</i><par n="c/òder__vblex"/></e>
